parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-names.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     person names (first and last names)
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	14-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.giv
!# OLD/tmp.fam
!# ADD/lexPeople_xerox.xip
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !2 = in both sources
!# !* = from old FSTs
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: first or "full" names from XIP lexicons are  missing gender ("XSG")
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+Firstname
+Fullname
+Lastname
+Title

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr 
+Pop   ! popular ???


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
barão+Title				MSG;	!*
baronesa+Title				FSG;	!*	!:barão
coroinha+Title				MSG;	!*
diaconisa+Title				FSG;	!*	!:diácono
doutora+Title				FSG;	!*	!:doutor
doutor+Title+Abbr:dr.			MSG;	!*
doutor+Title+Abbr:drs.			MPL;
escrivã+Title				FSG;	!*	!:escrivão
excelentíssima+Title+Abbr:exmas.	FPL;
excelentíssima+Title			FSG;
excelentíssimo+Title+Abbr:exmo.		MSG;
excelentíssimo+Title+Abbr:exmos.	MPL;
imperatriz+Title			FSG;	!*	!:imperador
juiz+Title				MSG;	!*
madame+Title				FSG;	!*
ministra+Title				FSG;	!*	!:ministro
mister+Title				MSG;	!*
nhá+Title+Pop				FSG;	!*
príncipe+Title				MSG;	!*
professora+Title+Abbr:profª		FSG;
professor+Title+Abbr:profs.		MPL;
rainha+Title				FSG;	!*	!:rei
rei+Title				MSG;	!*
senhora+Title+Abbr:sra.			FSG;	!*
senhores+Title+Abbr:srs.		MPL;	!*
senhor+Title				MSG;	!*
tia+Title				FSG;	!*	!:tio
tio+Title				MSG;	!*
sô+Title				MSG;
Abigail+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Adelino+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Adel+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Agostinha+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!*
Aimé+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Alda+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Aleixo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Alexandrine+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aline+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!brazil.
Aloysio+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Amália+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Anis+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Anjelica+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Amílcar+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Andrea+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Anita+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Antónia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
António+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Aristóteles+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!*
Arulemo+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!brazil.
Atsushi+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!japan.
Augusta+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Aysha+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Baltazar+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Bartolomeu+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!2
Benedita+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Bereco+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Berengária+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Boaventura+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Brad+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2	!foreign
Bruno+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Camila+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Camilo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Carlota+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Carmen+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Catarina+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Cesária+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
César+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Chico+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!dim
Claudia+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!brazil.
Clémence+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Colin+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Constantino+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Cristina+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Dália+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
David+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Delfina+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Désirée+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Dinah+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Diogo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Dirk+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Dorinha+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Ducília+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Duília+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Eduardo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Eliodora+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Eliseu+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Ema+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Emmanuel+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Estela+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Estevão+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Eunice+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Evandro+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Fátima+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Faustino+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Fernanda+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Filipa+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Florêncio+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Francisco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!2
Gastão+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
George+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2	!foreign
Gisela+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Giuletta+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Glenn+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Gordon+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Guilhermina+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Gusmão+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Heitor+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Hermenegildo+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Hilarião+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Honorina+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Humberto+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Ilduara+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Irene+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Isaque+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Ivo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Janina+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Janio+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Jerónimo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Joe+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2	!foreign
Jónatas+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Josué+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Judite+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Juliana+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Julieta+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Juscelino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!*
Karin+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!foreign
Katia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!foreign
Keiko+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!japan.
Kelly+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Kevin+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Lázaro+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Leonir+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Lia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Lindalva+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Lívia+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Ludwig+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!foreign
Luise+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Luiza+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!brazil.
Malik+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Malu+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Manu+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Márcio+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Marcos+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Marilda+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Mariza+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!brazil.
Martial+Prop+Firstname			MSG;
Máxima+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Mécia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Michael+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2	!foreign
Mina+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Murilo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Natália+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Noëlle+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Nepomuceno+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!*
Noriko+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!japan.
Nouri+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Octávio+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Onega+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Paio+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Patrício+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Paulino+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Pierre+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
Quintiliano+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Rada+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Raimundo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Renata+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Rocco+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Romão+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Rosália+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Rute+Prop+Firstname			XSG;
Santiago+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Shintaro+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!japan.
Sivuca+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Sofia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Susan+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Tereza+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Theodoro+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!*
Tony+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!foreign
Vânia+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Venâncio+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Vitória+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!2
Warner+Prop+Firstname			XSG;	!foreign
William+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2	!foreign
Zefa+Prop+Firstname			FSG;	!*
Zózimo+Prop+Firstname			MSG;	!2
Zulmira+Prop+Firstname			FSG;
Abou+Prop+Fullname			XSG;
Beni+Prop+Fullname			XSG;
Elira+Prop+Fullname			XSG;
Mao+Prop+Fullname			XSG;
Séthi+Prop+Fullname			XSG;
Aguirre+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Álvares+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Andersen+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Arafat+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Arraes+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Baet7a+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Barreto+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Benedict+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Blangis+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Botelho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Brun+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Cabrilho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Carvalho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Cerqueira+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Choi+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!chin.
Colm+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Coutinho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
da% Souza+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Domingues+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Duse+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Escobar+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Faninho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Fogaça+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Freud+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Goh+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!chin.
Goulart+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Gulbenkian+Prop+Lastname		XSP;	!*
Hilário+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Inácio+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Karsten+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Lacerda+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Lin+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!chin.
Lopez+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Magalhães+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Márquez+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Mattar+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Mendonça+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Miranda+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Montoro+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Moura+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Neves+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Nunes+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Pajeú+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Pessa+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Queirós+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Ramalho+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Resende+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Rosi+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Sales+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Saraiva+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Serafim+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Seydou+Prop+Lastname			XSG;
Siqueira+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Stroessner+Prop+Lastname		XSP;	!*
Teixeira+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Trindade+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!2
Vasques+Prop+Lastname			XSP;
Videla+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Wainer+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
Wu+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!chin.
Yang+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!chin.
Zumbano+Prop+Lastname			XSP;	!*
